District of Columbia statutes.
8-103.09a

Repealed

District of Columbia Wells Maintenance Fund; establishment; financing.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-188, § 10a
as added Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 612(d), 50 DCR 5668
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9089, 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 612(d) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 612(d) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).